West Virginia, session 2026, SB307.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 7. Authorization for Department of revenue to promulgate legislative rules. §64-7-1. Tax Department. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 25, 2025, authorized under the authority of §11-13MM-6 of this codte, modified by the Tax Department to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on September 24, 2025, relating to the Tax Department (income tax credits for property taxes paid, 110 CSR 21H), is authorized.